District of Columbia statutes.
19-903

Reformation.

Upon the petition of an interested person, a court shall reform a disposition in the manner that most closely approximates the transferor’s manifested plan of distribution and is within the 90 years allowed by section 19-901(a)(2) , (b)(2), or (c)(2) if:

(1)

A nonvested property interest or a power of appointment becomes invalid under section 19-901;

(2)

A class gift is not but might become invalid under section 19-901 and the time has arrived when the share of any class member is to take effect in possession or enjoyment; or

(3)

A nonvested property interest that is not validated by section 19-901(a)(1) can vest but not within 90 years after its creation.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 402(b), 48 DCR 2087
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities Act.